lang/common/courses/xfst-lexc/8.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
^[ ^] +N +Sg +Pl

LEXICON Root
0:^[{ NRoots ;
NRoots ;

LEXICON NRoots
buku NSuff ;
lembu NSuff ;
pelabuhan NSuff ;

LEXICON NSuff
+N:0    Num ;

LEXICON Num
+Sg:0 # ;
+Pl:}^2^] # ;
